Utah statutes.
13-20-4.   Nonconforming motor vehicles -- Replacement -- Refund -- Criteria
-- Defenses.
(1)  If the manufacturer, its agent, or its authorized dealer is unable to
conform the motor vehicle to any applicable express warranty by repairing or
correcting any defect or condition that substantially impairs the use, market
value, or safety of the motor vehicle after a reasonable number of attempts,
the manufacturer shall replace the motor vehicle with a comparable new motor
vehicle or accept return of the vehicle from the consumer and refund to the
consumer the full purchase price including all collateral charges, less a
reasonable allowance for the consumer's use of the vehicle.  Refunds shall be
made to the consumer, and any lienholders or lessors as their interests may
appear.
(2)  A reasonable allowance for use is that amount directly attributable to
use by the consumer prior to his first report of the nonconformity to the
manufacturer, its agent, or its authorized dealer, and during any subsequent
period when the vehicle is not out of service because of repair.
(3)  Upon receipt of any refund or replacement under Subsection (1), the
consumer, lienholder, or lessor shall furnish to the manufacturer clear title
to and possession of the motor vehicle.
(4)  It is an affirmative defense to any claim under this chapter:
(a)  that an alleged nonconformity does not substantially impair the
consumer's use of the motor vehicle and does not substantially impair the
market value or safety of the motor vehicle; or
(b)  that an alleged nonconformity is the result of abuse, neglect, or
unauthorized modifications or alterations of a motor vehicle by a consumer.
